Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “First Amendment


Open Meeting Protection Act”.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 312, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 312. A. The proceedings of a public body shall be kept


by a person so designated by such public body in the form of written


minutes which shall be an official summary of the proceedings


showing clearly those members present and absent, all matters


considered by the public body, and all actions taken by such public

Req. No. 3555 Page 1


body. The minutes of each meeting shall be open to public


inspection and shall reflect the manner and time of notice required


by this act Section 301 et seq. of this title.


B. In the written minutes of an emergency meeting, the nature


of the emergency and the proceedings occurring at such meeting,


including reasons for declaring such emergency meeting, shall be


included.


C. Any No public body or its members, officers, or staff, nor


any law enforcement officer or security personnel, present at a


public meeting shall prohibit any person attending a public meeting


may record from recording the proceedings of said the meeting by


videotape video recording, audiotape audio recording, or by any


other method; providing provided, however, such recording shall not


interfere with the conduct of the meeting.


D. In addition to penalties described in subsection B of


Section 314 of this title, any person who is unlawfully prohibited


from recording a public meeting in accordance with this section may


bring a civil action for monetary damages, if applicable.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3555 BLB 1/14/2026 3:00:12 PM

Req. No. 3555 Page 2